Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-8,312
Semiquincentennial Commission; meeting; officers; expenses; powers and duties.

(1) The Semiquincentennial Commission shall hold its first meeting no later than September 1, 2022.

(2) The members shall select a vice-chairperson and a secretary.

(3) Members shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties as members of the commission, except that such members shall receive reimbursement for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(4) The commission may employ personnel and contract for services and shall remit any gifts, grants, or donations to the State Treasurer for credit to the Semiquincentennial Commission Fund. The commission shall expend and allocate any appropriations authorized by the Legislature to carry out the purposes of the commission.

Laws 2021, LB275, § 2.